Wisconsin, session 2025, SB48.
do enact as follows:SB48,13Section 1. 5.051 of the statutes is created to read:SB48,2,245.051 Repeal of emergency rule. The emergency rule promulgated by the 5elections commission that took effect on July 1, 2024, and that created ss. EL 2.05 1and 2.07, Wis. Adm. Code, relating to challenge procedures for nomination papers, 2is repealed.SB48,2,33